ru_RU.aff
SFX J Y 32
SFX J   0     а           [^еёжйоь]
SFX J   0     а           [^ё]ж
SFX J   ёж    ежа         ёж
SFX J   0     у           [^еёжйоь]
SFX J   0     у           [^ё]ж
SFX J   ёж    ежу         ёж
SFX J   0     ом          [^еёжйоцчшщь]
SFX J   0     е           [^еёжйоь]
SFX J   0     е           [^ё]ж
SFX J   ёж    еже         ёж
SFX J   й     я           й
SFX J   й     ю           й
SFX J   й     ем          й
SFX J   й     е           [^и]й
SFX J   й     и           ий
SFX J   ь     я           ь
SFX J   ь     ю           ь
SFX J   ь     ем          ь
SFX J   ь     е           ь
SFX J   е     я           [^жцшщ]е
SFX J   ё     я           ё
SFX J   е     а           [жцшщ]е
SFX J   е     ю           [^жцшщ]е
SFX J   ё     ю           ё
SFX J   е     у           [жцшщ]е
SFX J   0     м           [её]
SFX J   е     и           ие
SFX J   ё     е           ьё
SFX J   о     а           о
SFX J   о     у           о
SFX J   0     м           о
SFX J   о     е           о

SFX N Y 17
SFX N   ь     и           ь
SFX N   0     ю           ь
SFX N   ь     ей          ь
SFX N   ь     ам          [жчшщ]ь
SFX N   ь     ям          [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N   ь     ами         [жчшщ]ь
SFX N   ь     ями         [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N   ь     ах          [жчшщ]ь
SFX N   ь     ях          [^жчшщ]ь
SFX N   0     а           [^ь]
SFX N   0     у           [^ь]
SFX N   0     ом          [^жцчшщь]
SFX N   0     е           [^ь]
SFX N   0     ов          [^жцчшщь]
SFX N   0     ам          [^ь]
SFX N   0     ами         [^ь]
SFX N   0     ах          [^ь]

SFX F Y 20
SFX F   ь     и           ь
SFX F   0     ю           ь
SFX F   а     ой          а
SFX F   а     у           а
SFX F   ая    ой          ая
SFX F   ая    ую          ая
SFX F   ок    ка          нок
SFX F   ок    ку          нок
SFX F   ок    ком         нок
SFX F   ок    ке          нок
SFX F   ёнок  ята         ёнок
SFX F   онок  ата         онок
SFX F   ёнок  ят          ёнок
SFX F   онок  ат          онок
SFX F   ёнок  ятам        ёнок
SFX F   онок  атам        онок
SFX F   ёнок  ятами       ёнок
SFX F   онок  атами       онок
SFX F   ёнок  ятах        ёнок
SFX F   онок  атах        онок

SFX O Y 122
SFX O   ий    ьего        ий
SFX O   ий    ьему        ий
SFX O   ий    ьим         ий
SFX O   ий    ьем         ий
SFX O   ий    ья          ий
SFX O   ий    ьей         ий
SFX O   ий    ью          ий
SFX O   ий    ье          ий
SFX O   ий    ьи          ий
SFX O   ий    ьих         ий
SFX O   ий    ьими        ий
SFX O   ень   ня          ень
SFX O   ень   ню          ень
SFX O   ень   нем         ень
SFX O   ень   не          ень
SFX O   ень   ни          ень
SFX O   ень   ней         ень
SFX O   ень   ням         ень
SFX O   ень   нями        ень
SFX O   ень   нях         ень
SFX O   ок    ка          ок
SFX O   ок    ку          ок
SFX O   ок    ком         ок
SFX O   ок    ке          ок
SFX O   ок    ки          ок
SFX O   ок    ков         ок
SFX O   ок    кам         ок
SFX O   ок    ками        ок
SFX O   ок    ках         ок
SFX O   оть   тя          оть
SFX O   оть   тю          оть
SFX O   оть   тем         оть
SFX O   оть   те          оть
SFX O   оть   ти          оть
SFX O   оть   тей         оть
SFX O   оть   тям         оть
SFX O   оть   тями        оть
SFX O   оть   тях         оть
SFX O   ец    ца          [^аеиол]ец
SFX O   ец    йца         [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец    ьца         лец
SFX O   ец    цу          [^аеиол]ец
SFX O   ец    йцу         [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец    ьцу         лец
SFX O   ец    йцем        [аеи]ец
SFX O   ец    це          [^аеиол]ец
SFX O   ец    йце         [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец    ьце         лец
SFX O   ец    цы          [^аеиол]ец
SFX O   ец    йцы         [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец    ьцы         лец
SFX O   0     ев          [анря]ц
SFX O   ец    йцев        [аеи]ец
SFX O   ец    цам         [^аеиол]ец
SFX O   ец    йцам        [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец    ьцам        лец
SFX O   ец    цами        [^аеиол]ец
SFX O   ец    йцами       [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец    ьцами       лец
SFX O   ец    цах         [^аеиол]ец
SFX O   ец    йцах        [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец    ьцах        лец
SFX O   ек    ка          [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ька         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    ку          [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ьку         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    ком         [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ьком        [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    ке          [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ьке         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    ки          [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ьки         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    ков         [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ьков        [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    кам         [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ькам        [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    ками        [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ьками       [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ек    ках         [жчш]ек
SFX O   ёк    ьках        [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ел    ла          ел
SFX O   ел    лу          ел
SFX O   ел    лом         ел
SFX O   ел    ле          ел
SFX O   ел    лы          ел
SFX O   ел    лов         ел
SFX O   ел    лам         ел
SFX O   ел    лами        ел
SFX O   ел    лах         ел
SFX O   ёл    ла          ёл
SFX O   ёл    лу          ёл
SFX O   ёл    лом         ёл
SFX O   ёл    ле          ёл
SFX O   ёл    лы          ёл
SFX O   ёл    лов         ёл
SFX O   ёл    лам         ёл
SFX O   ёл    лами        ёл
SFX O   ёл    лах         ёл
SFX O   и     ям          [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и     ам          [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и     ями         [абеилнорсь]и
SFX O   и     ями         [арс]ти
SFX O   и     ами         [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и     ях          [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и     ах          [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   ы     ам          ы
SFX O   ы     ами         ы
SFX O   ы     ах          ы
SFX O   0     м           [ая]
SFX O   0     ми          [ая]
SFX O   0     х           [ая]
SFX O   0     а           ин
SFX O   0     у           ин
SFX O   0     ом          ин
SFX O   0     е           ин
SFX O   ин    е           нин
SFX O   ин    ы           рин
SFX O   нин   н           нин
SFX O   рин   р           рин
SFX O   ин    ам          ин
SFX O   ин    ами         ин
SFX O   ин    ах          ин

SFX G Y 49
SFX G   0     а           [^ейкоцья]
SFX G   0     у           [^ейкоцья]
SFX G   0     ым          [^ежйкоцчшщья]
SFX G   0     е           [^ейкоцья]
SFX G   й     го          ой
SFX G   ий    ого         ий
SFX G   ый    ого         ый
SFX G   й     му          ой
SFX G   ий    ому         ий
SFX G   ый    ому         ый
SFX G   ой    им          ой
SFX G   й     м           ий
SFX G   й     м           ый
SFX G   й     м           ой
SFX G   ий    ом          ий
SFX G   ый    ом          ый
SFX G   ек    ка          ек
SFX G   ек    ку          ек
SFX G   ек    ком         ек
SFX G   ек    ке          ек
SFX G   ок    ка          ок
SFX G   ок    ку          ок
SFX G   ок    ком         ок
SFX G   ок    ке          ок
SFX G   ь     я           ь
SFX G   ь     ю           ь
SFX G   ь     ём          ь
SFX G   ь     е           ь
SFX G   ь     и           ь
SFX G   ь     ей          ь
SFX G   ь     ям          ь
SFX G   ь     ями         ь
SFX G   ь     ях          ь
SFX G   я     и           я
SFX G   я     е           [^и]я
SFX G   я     ю           я
SFX G   я     ёй          я
SFX G   я     ёю          я
SFX G   я     й           [еиу]я
SFX G   ня    ен          [^аезийоуыь]ня
SFX G   я     ь           [аеиоуы]ня
SFX G   йня   ен          йня
SFX G   ьня   ен          ьня
SFX G   0     м           я
SFX G   0     ми          я
SFX G   0     х           я
SFX G   ец    ца          ец
SFX G   ец    цу          ец
SFX G   ец    це          ец
