ru_RU.dic
Бийск/J
Генрих/J
Грибоедов/G
Жуковский/G
Зевс/J
Илья/G
Краснокамск/J
Курчатов/G
Лобачевский/G
Ляпунов/G
Монреаль/J
Остроградский/G
Пифагор/J
Пушкин/G
Репин/G
Соловки/O
Сопот/J
Столетов/G
Трускавец/G
Хвалынск/J
Чебышёв/G
Чехов/G
аварийность/F
автоматизирование/J
автотормоз/N
аденец/O
активность/N
алатырь/J
аляповатость/F
амманец/O
анкилоз/J
аппарель/N
арахниды/O
ароматичность/F
асбоволокнит/J
аэросани/O
бадья/G
банальность/N
банкротство/J
бардачок/G
барселонец/O
беглость/F
бездонность/F
беззаконность/N
безосновательность/F
бенедиктинец/O
бериллий/J
бесполезность/F
бешамель/F
благоглупость/N
блиночек/G
богоподобие/J
бодайбинец/O
бок/N
братья/O
брачок/G
бретель/N
бронепоезд/N
бугры/O
будничность/F
бузотёрство/J
бунтарь/G
вакуоль/N
ванкуверец/O
веерочек/G
вельвет/J
весы/O
весь/N
взаимообусловленность/F
взгорочек/G
виноград/J
виолончель/N
вихорок/O
возбуждённость/F
волдырь/G
волость/N
волочение/J
воротничок/O
враль/G
вспугивание/J
вшивость/F
вымаливание/J
выхолащивание/J
вьетнамец/O
вьюночек/G
газель/N
геном/J
гетеротрофы/O
гидроперекись/N
гиперболичность/F
главарь/G
глинозём/J
глухарь/G
годочек/O
голос/N
госсекретарь/G
грибочек/O
гроздь/N
громоздкость/F
грунтование/J
декабрь/G
дельтапланеризм/J
денёк/O
дерзость/N
детальность/F
директорство/J
дичок/O
длительность/N
дневничок/G
долгунец/G
дом/N
дописывание/J
достоверность/F
дубок/O
дымарь/G
ель/N
жарок/G
желатин/J
желток/O
желчь/F
жигулёнок/G
жирандоль/N
задубливание/J
задумчивость/F
закром/N
закуток/O
заприходование/J
запутанность/F
звонарь/G
звуковоспроизведение/J
землячок/O
зимостойкость/F
идентичность/N
издыхание/J
измеримость/F
изопоры/O
изъянец/G
инспекторство/J
ирландец/O
ироничность/F
исповедь/N
кал/J
кандалы/O
кастовость/F
кварцит/J
кетмень/G
кетозы/O
кислотность/N
кистень/G
кобель/G
кодеин/J
козёл/O
колосочек/G
конечность/N
конкордантность/F
конногвардеец/O
контрфорс/J
король/G
костыль/G
кошечий/O
крепость/N
кристалличность/F
кровопролитие/J
кубинец/O
кукушонок/G
кустарь/G
лактамы/O
лантан/J
лань/N
ларь/G
ленок/G
лета/O
летучесть/F
листаж/J
лоскуток/O
лошадь/N
лучок/G
майорат/J
македонец/O
малотиражность/F
масть/N
матерок/G
междуцарствие/J
мемуары/O
метель/N
механистичность/F
милёночек/G
милосердие/J
мирок/O
многочисленность/F
монтичеллит/J
моршанец/O
москаль/G
мощность/N
мягкосердечность/F
нагноение/J
нальчанин/O
намагниченность/N
нарцеин/J
насыщаемость/F
невоспламеняемость/F
недоговорённость/N
недостойность/F
недосыпание/J
незнакомец/O
неиссякаемость/F
необоримость/F
неожиданность/N
неощутительность/F
непредусмотрительность/F
неразделимость/F
несмышлёность/F
нестабильность/N
неуклюжесть/F
неученье/J
низость/N
никчёмность/F
новозеландец/O
ноль/G
обеззоливание/J
ободранец/O
обожание/J
обострённость/F
обрывочек/G
общность/N
одинаковость/F
односельчанин/O
одушевление/J
округлость/N
опознавание/J
оправданность/F
орден/N
орёл/O
остепенение/J
отголосок/O
отказоустойчивость/F
откуп/N
офранцуживание/J
очередь/N
пакистанец/O
партийность/F
патруль/G
пачули/O
педаль/N
переглядывание/J
переулок/O
песнь/N
петля/G
пикноз/J
пинок/O
писклёнок/F
плешь/N
поганец/O
погнутость/N
подмалёвок/G
подмесь/F
подранок/O
подробность/N
подсаливание/J
полковничий/O
полугодок/G
поляризуемость/N
понятность/F
попадья/G
порожек/O
посол/J
потребность/N
початок/O
преднамеренность/F
предрасположенность/N
приживаемость/F
принижение/J
приступочек/O
прихоть/N
проворность/F
прорезь/N
просо/J
прусачий/O
прыть/F
псарь/G
пустырь/G
пышность/N
пяльцы/O
разводимость/F
раздробление/J
разновидность/N
разрядность/F
рассольничек/G
рационирование/J
рвы/O
реакционность/F
рог/N
россиянин/O
рубль/G
рудоносность/F
рукоять/N
садовничий/O
самозарождение/J
сваебоец/O
сверхинтеллигентность/F
светлость/N
свинец/G
сельхозартель/N
семейственность/F
семья/G
семяизлияние/J
сенозаготовки/O
скамья/G
скатерть/N
скоординированность/F
скупец/O
сложность/N
смиренность/F
снаряжение/J
снегирь/G
собачий/O
соотнесённость/F
спартанец/O
специальность/N
статичность/F
стибин/J
стог/N
стожок/O
стрепетёнок/G
сульфоны/O
супонь/N
сутолочь/F
сухарь/G
тепловидение/J
теплоцентраль/N
теплоэлектроцентраль/F
тетраэтилсвинец/G
тиксинец/O
тонкость/N
трогательность/F
троемужие/J
тулья/G
туманность/N
уголок/O
удалённость/F
уплощённость/F
усваивание/J
участь/N
фальсифицированность/F
ферзь/G
фотоснимок/O
фритредерство/J
функциональность/N
хлебушек/G
хлопотность/F
хоругвь/N
царь/G
циангидрины/O
цоизит/J
цыган/N
чесночок/G
чёрствость/F
шаль/N
шершень/O
штырь/G
шустрость/F
эклектизм/J
электропечь/N
эротичность/F
январь/G
японец/O
